Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 209.021, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Manner; time; contents. Service of a notice of contest must be made in the same manner as the service of summons in civil actions. The notice of contest must specify the grounds on which the contest will be made. The contestant shall serve notice of the contest on the parties enumerated in this section. Except as provided in section 204D.27new text begin ; 209.10, subdivision 5a; or 351.02, subdivision 2new text end , notice must be served and filed within five days after the canvass is completed in the case of a primary or special primary or within seven days after the canvass is completed in the case of a special or general election. If a contest is based on a deliberate, serious, and material violation of the election laws that was discovered from the statements of receipts and disbursements required to be filed by candidates and committees, the action may be commenced and the notice served and filed within ten days after the filing of the statements in the case of a general or special election or within five days after the filing of the statements in the case of a primary or special primary. If a notice of contest questions only which party received the highest number of votes legally cast at the election, a contestee who loses may serve and file a notice of contest on any other ground during the three days following expiration of the time for appealing the decision on the vote count. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 209.10, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Vacancy. new text end new text begin If a vacancy results from a successful election contest and the basis of the contest was candidate misconduct, the chief clerk of the house of representatives or secretary of the senate must immediately notify the secretary of state of the vacancy. Unless an election contest is filed within two business days after the secretary of state is notified of the vacancy, on the third day after receiving notice, the secretary of state must issue to the chief clerk or secretary a certificate of election for the candidate who received the second most votes in the most recent general election for that office. Chapter 204D does not apply to a vacancy described in this subdivision, except where a vacancy occurs and there is no other candidate from the most recent general election to take office. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 351.02, is amended to read: 351.02 VACANCIES. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Vacancies. new text end Every office shall become vacant on the happening of deleted text begin eitherdeleted text end new text begin anynew text end of the following events, before the expiration of the term of such office: (1) the death of the incumbent; (2) the incumbent's resignation; (3) the incumbent's removal; (4) the incumbent's ceasing to be an inhabitant of the state, or, if the office is local, of the district, countynew text begin ,new text end or city for which the incumbent was elected or appointed, or within which the duties of the office are required to be discharged; (5) the incumbent's conviction of any infamous crime, or of any offense involving a violation of the official oath; (6) the incumbent's refusal or neglect to take the oath of office, or to give or renew the official bond, or to deposit or file such oath or bond within the time prescribed; (7) the decision of a competent tribunal declaring the incumbent's election or appointment void; (8) the death of the person elected or appointed to fill a vacancy, or for a full term, before the person qualifies, or before the time when by law the person should enter upon the duties of the office, in which case the vacancy shall be deemed to take place at the time when the term of office would have begun had the person liveddeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (9) the incumbent has been found to be ineligible to hold office; or new text end new text begin (10) a candidate or incumbent has been found to have made a significant and material violation of sections 10A.173 to 10A.177. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Filling legislative vacancies. new text end new text begin (a) Upon making a determination pursuant to the Minnesota Constitution, article IV, section 6, that a member of the body is ineligible or unqualified for office for one of the reasons stated in subdivision 1, the body must declare a vacancy in that seat. new text end new text begin (b) A vacancy under this subdivision must be filled as provided in this paragraph. The chief clerk of the house of representatives or secretary of the senate must immediately notify the secretary of state of the vacancy. Unless an election contest is filed within two business days after the secretary of state is notified of the vacancy, on the third day after receiving notice, the secretary of state must issue to the chief clerk or secretary a certificate of election for the candidate who received the second most votes in the most recent general election for that office. Chapter 204D does not apply to this subdivision, except where a vacancy occurs and there is no other candidate from the most recent general election to take office. new text end